releases/.data/cy_GB.dic
acryloid/H
adelw/Hw
adfori/Hv
adlif/BEHRv
adwreiddiau/H
affidafid/BCH
afraslon/AH
ag/H
ailallforiad/BH
aildyf/Hv
Ailfedyddi/HQ
ailfywheui/Hk
ailgloddio/H
ailgymwys/Hz
ailgyneu/Hvz
ailgynhyrchi/Hy
ail-lenw/Hvw
alcam/H
Almaenes/BH
amarch/Hz
amgylchfyd/EH
amgylchyn/BHRv
amheu/QRXy
amhiniog/BCH
amlin/BDH
amneidi/Hv
anaml/AH
anardd/Hz
anffyddlon/H
Anghydffurfi/QRX
angor/BCHv
anhardd/AH
anian/BHR
annefnyddadwy/H
ansicr/AH
anudd/Hz
aparitor/CGH
apocarpog/H
arddodiad/HR
areithi/HQv
areithle/EH
aresgid/DH
argymell/Hz
argymhell/Hy
Arminiaid/H
aros/Hz
arwedd/BCHv
arwyddoca/HRv
asen/FH
asymptot/BH
atebiad/BHR
ateli/Hw
atgryfheui/Hk
atgynhyrch/Hvy
atgynyrch/Hz
athrawiaethu/H
babi/IMT
bancer/GMT
baner/BMQTv
banwes/KMT
bas/ABMQT
bawddyn/CMT
beiro/IMT
berf/BMRT
bil/DMT
bir/EMT
blaenllymder/MT
blagurog/MT
blasyn/FMT
blewynn/Mv
boler/MQv
Bolsiefic/GMT
bownd/DMT
brandi/IMT
brech/BKMQTv
bref/BMTv
breu/Mvz
briwell/BMT
brown/ADMT
bryndir/EMT
budrelw/MTvw
bwla/HKMT
bwrdeisi/QRX
bycl/Mv
byrheui/Mk
bysbrint/DMT
cableiriau/LMT
cablydd/CLMT
cadarnheui/LMk
cadeirlan/FLMT
cadlyw/GLMT
Caergwrle/LMT
camarwain/LMT
candi/ILMT
caniate/Xw
canwe/ELMT
capriccio/LMT
carbocsihaemoglobin/LMT
carfil/KLMT
cartref/LMRTv
carueiddwch/LMT
casbeth/BLMT
casgl/CLMQTv
cawenni/LMT
ceden/FLMTv
cefnfur/DLMT
cenedl-ddyn/CLMT
cenedl/LMTz
cerddorfeydd/LMT
cerhyntau/LMT
cernodi/LMQv
chwrligwgan/K
chwydfa/E
cibyn/FLMT
cilogram/BLMT
ciper/GLMT
claerwych/ALMT
claficord/DLMT
clapio/LMT
clec/DILMT
cledd/BLMTw
cloddi/LMQv
cnaciog/LMT
cnepynnaidd/LMT
cneu/LMvz
cnul/DLMT
cobra/KLMT
coden/FLMT
coegddyn/CLMT
coflith/ELMT
cofrestrfa/LMT
cogyddes/BLMT
colliadau/LMT
cono/ILMT
corfenn/LMw
cosfeydd/LMT
costrel/BLMTv
cowper/GLMT
cramen/FLMT
creision/LMTv
crë/LMQv
crinolin/BLMT
criw/DLMT
crocbynt/LMT
croch/ALMT
croen/LMRTv
crofen/FLMT
cropiedydd/CLMT
crwman/KLMT
cryngylch/BELMT
crythorio/LMT
cuddwisg/LMT
culheui/LMk
cusen/Xw
cwlffyn/FLMT
cwnsler/GLMT
cwymp/BDLMQRTv
cwympo/LMT
cwynfanllyd/LMT
cydfeddiann/LMv
cydlawenheui/LMk
cydosodydd/CLMT
cydrannydd/LMT
cyd-serennu/LMT
cydymgeisi/QRX
cyfarwydd/CDGLMRTv
cyfateb/LMRTv
cyffindir/ELMT
cyffredinrwydd/LMT
cyfieu/LMvz
cyfle/EHLMT
cyfnerth/CELMQRTv
cyfnither/EKLMT
cyfoesol/CLMT
cyfrenn/LMw
cyfrwys/ALMT
cyhyren/LMT
cylchen/FLMT
cylchfan/FLMT
cymath/LMQTz
cymhar/LMRTy
cymod/LMQRTv
cymrodoriaeth/BLMT
cymwys/LMTz
cymysgfa/ELMT
cynaeaf/LMQv
cynes/LMz
cyn-gofrestru/LMT
cynhali/LMQRy
cynhyrchi/LMRy
cynhyrf/QXy
cynnyrch/LMT
cynwys/LMz
cynyrf/LMTz
cysod/LMQv
cyson/ALMQTv
cythlwng/LMT
cytrefiad/BLMT
dadleu/MQRTvz
dalen/FMT
damper/BIMT
datblygydd/CMT
datbroffesu/MT
datgymal/Mv
datrys/MQRTv
deddfeg/MQT
deheuwynt/EMT
deialydd/MT
delw/BMTvw
deric/DIMT
dewin/GMTv
di-ecwiti/MT
diferiad/BMT
diflasrwydd/MT
diflenn/Mw
difrif/AMT
dihatr/Mv
dirnad/MRTv
diti/MQRv
diwladwriaeth/MT
diystyr/AMTv
dodw/Mvw
dof/AMQTv
dogfen/FMT
domino/IMT
drag/DMT
dwmpi/Mv
dwyreinwynt/EMT
dyfalbarheui/Mk
dyfrheui/Mk
dygn/AMTv
dyrenn/Mw
Dyrnogydd/MT
dysychedig/MT
ebol/CH
Ecuador/H
Ecwador/HU
eferw/HRvw
efrydd/CGHR
eiddil/AH
eilun/HK
eithaf/CEHQR
electrosgop/BH
elfen/FH
endoderm/BH
enw/BHvw
epil/CEH
erw/BH
esgid/DH
ewach/HK
faciwî/I
ffelon/G
ffiwdalheui/k
ffiwdal/O
ffrwydrydd/C
ffrwythyn/F
ffugliw/D
ffyrlling/BK
fila/I
fitamin/B
gall/MTv
gardd-ddinas/EMT
gerwin/AMRTv
gigue/IMT
glanheui/Mk
glasenw/MTvw
Gnostig/GT
gogleddwr/MT
golchadwyaeth/MT
goleu/MQRvz
gorlenw/Mvw
gorlifan/FMT
gosod/MQTv
grymus/AMRTv
gwaelddyn/CMT
gwain/MT
gwarchodle/EMT
gwardrob/BKMT
gwedd/BEMRTv
gwegil/BDMT
gweithfan/FMT
gwellheui/Mk
gwib/DMT
gwiredd/BMTv
gwiwer/KMTv
gwlypdir/EMT
gwniyddes/BMT
gwrandawn/MT
gwrtholeu/QX
gwylog/KMT
gwymp/AMT
gwyw/MRTvw
hawlydd/C
hiena/IK
Hiwgenot/G
hop/I
horosgop/B
hwyrheui/k
iechyd/HR
igwana/HK
inc/DH
ir/AHQv
islif/BEH
is-linyn/FH
isreolweithiau/H
jini/I
jygarnot/G
ligado/I
llabi/KM
llafargan/Mv
llawdryfer/BM
llawenheui/Mk
lledferw/Mvw
llin-argraffydd/CM
llinell/BMQRv
llithriwl/DM
llorp/DM
llwfrheui/Mk
llwynog/KM
llwyr/AX
llysenw/BMvw
llysieu/QRX
mamfaeth/BKM
mangre/EM
marchnatä/QX
marionét/IM
marsial/GM
mawrheui/Mk
melanoffor/BM
melyn/AMv
metacarpws/M
micro-don/FM
mitsi/Mv
modd/BCMPR
molienn/Mw
monsŵn/IM
morgranc/KM
moron/GM
mwyha/MRv
mwynheui/Mk
natur/E
negeseu/vz
nos/Bv
nyth/Kv
ocsiyn/QX
ofer/AHQv
ôl-bwynt/DH
olrheiniadwy/H
opereta/HI
Pacistan/LMTU
Pantycelyn/LMT
parheui/LMk
parot/GLMT
parotid/LMT
pasiffist/LMNOT
pelen/FLMT
pêl-feryn/FLMT
pen-cogydd/CLMT
pen-glin/DLMT
pererindod/BLMT
peristalsis/LMT
picl/BILMTv
pitï/LMy
Piwritan/GLMT
pleidi/LMQv
plwtocratiaeth/LMT
pob/LMQRTv
powleidiau/LMT
prifddinas/ELMT
prinheui/LMk
proffil/DLMT
proffwyd/LMQRTv
prostheteg/LMT
pwdlo/LMT
rachis/B
raiot/G
rhagargoel/CM
rhagdudalen/FM
rheiti/AX
rhiant-lywodraeth/QX
rhosfeu/Mvz
rhwyddheui/Mk
rymba/I
Sarasen/G
sarheui/k
sbermatosoid/B
sbleis/D
sebra/IK
sefydl/Rv
sgami/v
sgeptig/G
sgrinni/bfg
sider/C
sigarét/I
sled/D
stoic/G
storle/E
suddfan/F
syfliad/B
Taliaris/LMT
Tal-y-garn/LMT
tatŵ/BILMT
teirenn/LMw
teledeip/DLMT
telegraff/BLMT
tirfeddiann/QX
tirfesurydd/CLMT
tiwtor/GLMT
torbytiaid/LMT
totem/BLMT
tragwyddol/LMTv
trawben/FLMT
Trebanog/LMT
treiddi/LMRv
trorym/ELMT
trostorri/LMT
truan/ALMT
trychfil/KLMT
trymplaen/DLMT
twrio/LMT
tynheui/LMk
tyniann/QX
unlliw/H
urddwisg/EH
webin/BH
ymadew/Hw
ymadferth/H
ymanerch/Hvy
ymaros/Hz
ymbarél/HI
ymestynn/HQRv
ymgel/Hv
ymgom/CDH
ymgynnal/H
ymlawenheui/Hk
ymynys/QX
ysbrigyn/H
